Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1040.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Budgetary Impasse Investment Loan Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Budgetary impasse." Any of the following:(1) The period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending on the effective date of a General Appropriation Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.(2) The period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending on the effective date of a General Appropriation Act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.123456789101112131415161718 "Budgetary impasse investment loan." An investment loan entered into or otherwise authorized by the State Treasurer, pursuant to section 301.1 of the Fiscal Code, during a budgetary impasse, the purpose of which is to provide short-term funding support to a loan recipient in anticipation of the receipt of State appropriation payments subsequent to the enactment of the General Appropriation Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year or the General Appropriation Act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year."Fiscal Code." The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code."Head Start." A program funded under the Federal Head Start Act established by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (Public Law 97-35, 95 Stat. 357) and carried out by a Head Start agency or delegate agency that provides ongoing comprehensive child development services."Loan recipient." Any of the following:(1) The governing body of a county government.(2) A domestic violence entity which receives a direct grant from the Department of Human Services from the appropriation for domestic violence programs.(3) A Head Start agency.(4) A rape crisis entity which receives a direct grant from the Department of Human Services from the appropriation for rape crisis programs.(5) An approved provider under the Pennsylvania Pre-K Counts Program that receives a direct grant from the Department of Education from the appropriation for the Pre-K Counts Program.Section 3. Waiver of interest.The State Treasurer may waive or otherwise forgo, in the 20250SB1040PN1208 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Treasurer's sole discretion, the imposition, demand and collection of any interest, costs or fees associated with a budgetary impasse investment loan issued pursuant to section 301.1 of the Fiscal Code, the exercise of which shall not be deemed a violation of or otherwise inconsistent with the State Treasurer's fiduciary investment standard under section 301.1(h) and (i) of the Fiscal Code.Section 4. Application.This act shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2025.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1040PN1208 - 3 - 1234567891011